apertium-myv-fin.myv.lexc
LEXICON A_ТИНГЕ
:О1 Adj-pango-tinge ;
%<a%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_ПАНГО ;
%<a%>:О1%> N2Dem-SE ;

LEXICON A_ПАНГО
:О1 Adj-pango-tinge ;
%<a%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_ПАНГО ;
%<a%>:О1%> N2Dem-SE ;

LEXICON Adj-pango-tinge
%<a%>: K ;
%<a%>: _ПАНГО-NomSg-Conjugation ;
%<a%>%<pl%>:%>тЬ2 _КИТ-NomPl-Conjugation ;
%<a%>%<pl%>: _ПАНГО-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;
%<a%>%<pl%>:%>тЬ2 K ;

LEXICON ActDemPrc-A
%<act-dem-prc%>: A_КУДО_01 ;

LEXICON A_КУДО_SUB
%<use_sub%>: A_КУДО	;

LEXICON A_КУДО
%<a%>: A_КУДО_01 ;
%<a%>:%> N2Dem-SE ;

LEXICON A_КУДО_01
 K ;
 DER/PR4_OBL ; !! 2013-04-17
%<pl%>:%>тЬ2 _КИТ-NomPl-Conjugation ;
!2013-03-15!%<pl%>: _КУДО-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;
%<pl%>:%>тЬ2 K ;
%<der_mwn%>: NMN_КУДО ;


LEXICON Adj-InterrRel ! кодамо
%<interr%>: A_ПАНГО ;
%<rel%>: A_ПАНГО ;

LEXICON Adj-Dem ! истямо
%<dem%>: A_ПАНГО ;

LEXICON Adj-Po ! кондямо
%<po%>: A_ПАНГО ;

!! ADVERBS

LEXICON AdvState-kudo_Sub
%<use_sub%>: AdvState-kudo ; 

LEXICON AdvState-kudo
%<adv%>%<state%>: K ;
%<adv%>%<state%>%<der_pred%>:%> StateConjugation-kudo ;
%<adv%>%<state%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_КУДО ;


! This is fed by AdvState
LEXICON StateConjugation-kudo
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scsg1%>:А2н K ;
%<dial%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scsg1%>:ян K ;
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scsg2%>:А2т K ;
%<dial%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scsg2%>:ят K ;
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scsg3%>: K ;
%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<scsg1%>:линь K ;
%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<scsg2%>:лить K ;
%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<scsg3%>:ль K ;

%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scpl1%>:тА2но K ;
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scpl2%>:тА2до K ;
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scpl3%>:тЬ2 K ;
%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<scpl1%>:линек K-lak ;
%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<scpl2%>:лиде K ;
%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<scpl3%>:льть K ;


LEXICON Ad-A_ ! 
%<adv%>%<ada%>: WORD-END ;

LEXICON ADV_ ! 
%<adv%>: K ;

LEXICON ADV_КУДО ! Coping with stem structure
 ADV_ ;

! истяк 
LEXICON ADV_ЛАК
%<adv%>: K-lak ;

LEXICON ADV_ОШ
%<adv%>: K ;

LEXICON ADV_КАЛ
%<adv%>: K ;

LEXICON ADV-TEMP_
%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>: K ;

LEXICON Adv_Phrase ! 
%<adv%>: WORD-END ;

LEXICON Adv-Ideoph ! 
%<adv-ideoph%>: K ;
! сорк, кальцк ; twang, thwang, bang

LEXICON Adv-Ideoph-Ine ! 
%<adv-ideoph%>%<cx_ine%>: K ;

LEXICON Exclusive ! 
%<adv%>%<exclusive%>: K ;

LEXICON Adv-Ine ! 
%<cx_ine%>: ADV_ ;

LEXICON Adv-Tra ! 
%<cx_tra%>: ADV_ ;

LEXICON MANNER_ ! 
%<adv%>%<manner%>: K ;

LEXICON Manner-Interr ! 
%<interr%>%<adv%>%<manner%>: K ;

LEXICON	PRED2-OBJ_КУДО !! "апак прядо"
%<pred2%>: K ;
LEXICON	PRED2-OBJ_ОШ
%<pred2%>: K ;

LEXICON PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО_Sub !!
%<use_sub%>: PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО ;
LEXICON PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО !! "стядо"
%<pred2%>: K ;
LEXICON PRED2-SUBJ_ОШ
%<pred2%>: K ;


LEXICON Pred2 ! "стядо", "апак прядо", "чавонь кедть"
%<pred2%>: K ;
%<pred2%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_КУДО ;

!! spatial adverbs 
!! dependent and independent case marking 
LEXICON SPAT-NoArg
%<adv%>%<spat%>: K ;

LEXICON AdvSPAT-Ela
%<adv%>%<cx_ela%>: K ;
%<adv%>%<cx_ela%>: DER/PR4_OBL ;

LEXICON AdvSPAT-Ill
%<adv%>%<cx_ill%>: K ;

LEXICON AdvSPAT-Ine
%<adv%>%<cx_ine%>: K ;
%<adv%>%<cx_ine%>: DER/PR4_OBL ;

LEXICON AdvSPAT-Lat
%<adv%>%<cx_lat%>: K ;

LEXICON AdvSPAT-Prl
%<adv%>%<cx_prl%>: K ;
%<adv%>%<cx_prl%>: DER/PR4_OBL ;

LEXICON SPAT-Interr
%<interr%>%<spat%>: WORD-END ;

LEXICON Spat_
%<adv%>%<spat%>: K ;

LEXICON SPAT-Ela
%<adv%>%<spat%>%<cx_ela%>: K ;
!%<po%>%<spat%>%<cx_ela%>: _КУДО-Possessive-Before-K ;

LEXICON SPAT-Ine
%<spat%>%<cx_ine%>: K ;
!%<po%>%<spat%>%<cx_ine%>: _КУДО-Possessive-Before-K ;

LEXICON SPAT-Lat
%<spat%>%<cx_lat%>: K ;

LEXICON SPAT-Prl
%<spat%>%<cx_prl%>: K ;
!%<po%>%<spat%>%<cx_prl%>: _КУДО-Possessive-Before-K ;

!!Temporal tags with cases
LEXICON TEMP_
%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>: K ;

!! This marking would indicate a word form that may be 
!  construed as an adv as well as a adposition.
LEXICON Temp-NoArg
%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>: K ;

LEXICON Temp-Coll
%<coll%>%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>: K ;

LEXICON Temp-Distr
%<distr%>%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>: K ;

LEXICON Temp-Ela
%<cx_ela%>%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>: K ;

LEXICON Temp-Ill
%<cx_ill%>%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>: K ;

LEXICON Temp-Indef
%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>%<indef%>: K ;

LEXICON Temp-Interr
%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>%<interr%>: K ;

LEXICON Temp-Lat
%<cx_lat%>%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>: K ;

LEXICON Temp-ms
%<der_мс%>%<cx_ill%>%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>: K ;

LEXICON Temp-Pl
%<pl%>%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>: K ;

LEXICON Temp-Prl
%<cx_prl%>%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>: K ;

LEXICON Temp-Temp
%<cx_tmp%>%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>: K ;

LEXICON ADV_ЛАК-TEMP
%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>: K ;
%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_ЛАК ;

LEXICON ADV_КИТ-TEMP
%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>: K ;
%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_КИТ ;

LEXICON ADV_КУДО-TEMP
%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>: K ;
%<adv%>%<cx_tmp%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_КУДО ;


!! CONJUNCTIONS

!! CLITICS

LEXICON K-lak
%<use_sub%>%<foc_гак%>:%>KLossГ1ак WORD-END ;
 K ;

LEXICON K
            WORD-END ; 
%<foc_гак%>:%>Г1ак WORD-END ;
@R.POS.N@  NounEnd ; !2013-04-18
@R.POS.V@  VerbEnd ; !2013-04-18

LEXICON Ks
%<use_sub%>@R.KLOSS.ON@:%>ак@R.KLOSS.ON@ WORD-END ;
%<foc_гак%>:%>Г1ак WORD-END ;
   WORD-END ; ! No clitics




LEXICON NounEnd_K
 K ;
 NounEnd ;

LEXICON NounEnd_K-lak
 K-lak ;
 NounEnd ;

LEXICON NounEnd
%<coll%>N%-@R.DECL-NX.PL@@D.HYPH-COMBO.ACRO@:0%-@R.DECL-NX.PL@@D.HYPH-COMBO.ACRO@ Nouns ;
 

!!
LEXICON VerbEnd_K
 K ;
 VerbEnd ;

LEXICON VerbEnd_K-lak
 K-lak ;
 VerbEnd ;

LEXICON VerbEnd
#;
%<serial_verb%>:%- Verbs ;



!! END 

LEXICON WORD-END
 # ;


!! NONVERBAL CONJUGATION

LEXICON DER/PR4_OBL
!! This is where adjectives get their plural T.
 DER/PR_SG ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL3 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL3 ;

LEXICON DER/PR4_OBL-SC3
 DER/PR_SG ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL3_ZERO ;

 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL3 ;


!! used with infinitives

LEXICON _КУДО-Tenses1-4Inf
 _КУДО-Tenses-NomSg-4Inf ;
 _КУДО-Tenses-NomPl-4Inf ;

LEXICON _КУДО-Tenses-NomSg-4Inf
 VerbEnd_K ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-SG1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-SG2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-SG3 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-SG1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-SG2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-SG3 ;

LEXICON _КУДО-Tenses-NomPl-4Inf
 VerbEnd_K ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL3 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL3 ;


! =========== !
!! Conjugation 
! =========== !

LEXICON sajems-Conjugation-4Inf
 _КАЛ-Conjugation-4Inf ;
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<ocsg1%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>самизь VerbEnd_K ;
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<ocsg2%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>тА2дызь VerbEnd_K ;
%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<ocsg1%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>%^О2лимизь VerbEnd_K ;
%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<ocsg2%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>%^О2лидизь VerbEnd_K ;
%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<ocsg3%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>%^О2лизь VerbEnd_K ;
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<ocpl1%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>самизь VerbEnd_K ;
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<ocpl2%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>тА2дызь VerbEnd_K ;
%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<ocpl1%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>%^О2лимизь VerbEnd_K ;
%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<ocpl2%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>%^О2лидизь VerbEnd_K ;
%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<ocpl3%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>%^О2лизь VerbEnd_K ;



LEXICON _КАЛ-Conjugation-4Inf
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-SG1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-SG2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-SG3 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-SG1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-SG2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-SG3 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL3_ZERO ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL3 ;


LEXICON Tenses1_Prep-SG
@P.NUM.SG@ Tenses1 ;

LEXICON _ОШ-Tenses1_Prep-SG
@P.NUM.SG@ _ОШ-Tenses1 ;

LEXICON _КУДО-Tenses1_Prep-SG
@P.NUM.SG@ _КУДО-Tenses1 ;


LEXICON Tenses1_A
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-SG1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-SG2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-SG1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-SG2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-SG3 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL3 ;

!! !!!NON-VERB CONJUGATION 


! =========== !
!! Conjugation 
! =========== !

LEXICON _ЛАК-NomSg-Conjugation
 _КАЛ-NomSg-Conjugation ;
 NounEnd_K-lak  ;
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scsg3%>: NounEnd_K-lak ;

LEXICON _ЛАК-NomPl-Conjugation
 _КАЛ-NomPl-Conjugation ;
 NounEnd_K-lak  ;

LEXICON _ЛАК-NomPl-Conjugation-only
 _КАЛ-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;
 NounEnd_K-lak  ;

LEXICON Adjectives
а% кунсолыця:а% кунсолыця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% неиця:а% неиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
вишкинька:вишкинька A_КУДО  "" ;
кезэпеке:кезэпек A_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
кодамо:кодам Adj-InterrRel  "minkälainen, millainen." ;
кондямо:кондям Adj-Po  "kaltainen, lainen, tapainen" ;
лавшо:лавш A_ПАНГО  "heikko, höllä, löyhä" ;
ламбамо-ризаня:ламбамо-ризаня A_КУДО  "" ;
лёмзёрсельме:лёмзёрсельм A_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
мельс% каявиця:мельс% каявиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
нурькине:нирькине A_КУДО_SUB  "lyhyt, lyhkäinen" ;
нучко-начко:нучко-начк A_ПАНГО  "" ;
сельмевалдо:сельмевалд A_ПАНГО  "" ;
сроктомо:сроктомо A_КУДО  "" ;
суликасельме:суликасельм A_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
LEXICON Adverbs
эль-эль:эль-эль ADV_КАЛ  "" ;
пельксэнь-пелькс:пельксэнь-пелькс ADV_ОШ  "" ;
васенцекс:васенцекс ADV_ОШ  "" ;
зыглый:зыглый Ad-A_  "" ;
пельс:пельс Ad-A_  "" ;
кунст:кунст Pred2  "" ;
ландядо:ландядо PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО  "" ;
лондадо:лондадо PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО  "" ;
пульзядо:пульзядо AdvState-kudo  "" ;
стядо:стядо PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО  "" ;
чавонь% кедть:чавонь% кедть Pred2  "" ;
штадо:штадо AdvState-kudo  "" ;
штапо:штапо AdvState-kudo  "" ;
иредьстэ:иретьстэ PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО_Sub  "" ;
ансяк:ансяк Exclusive  "" ;
беремасо:беремасо Adv-Ine  "" ;
васня:васня ADV-TEMP_ ;
дубор-габор:дубор-габор Adv_Phrase  "" ;
дубушки:дубушки Adv-Ideoph  "" ;
истяк:истяк ADV_ЛАК  "" ;
истямо% ладсо:истямо% ладсо Adv-Ine  "" ;
карвокс:карвокс Adv-Tra  "" ;
келейстэ:келейстэ ADV_  "" ;
корсо:корсо Adv-Ideoph-Ine  "" ;
либорк:либорк Adv-Ideoph  "" ;
мельга-мельцек:мельга-мельцек Adv_Phrase  "" ;
нежекс:нежекс Adv-Tra  "" ;
оймень% ды% седеень% бажамосо:оймень% ды% седеень% бажамосо Adv-Ine  "" ;
польдерьсэ:польдерьсэ Adv-Ideoph-Ine  "" ;
састынька:састынька ADV_  "" ;
семс:семс ADV-TEMP_  "tähän asti; siihen asti" ;
сырк:сырк Adv-Ideoph  "" ;
течимс:течимс ADV-TEMP_  "tähän päivään asti" ;
цяторсо:цяторсо Adv-Ideoph-Ine  "" ;
самай:самай Ad-A_  "juuri" ;
эрексиякс:эрексиякс Adv-Tra  "" ;
ёколт-ёколт:ёколт-ёколт Adv_Phrase  "" ;
ялатеке:ялатеке ADV_КУДО  "kuitenkin, joka tapauksessa; samantekevää" ;
вадрясто:вадрясто MANNER_  "" ;
калгодосто:калгодосто MANNER_  "" ;
таймазасто:таймазасто MANNER_  "" ;
видьга:видьга Spat_  "" ;
кершев:кершев SPAT-Lat  "" ;
ланга:ланга SPAT-Prl  "" ;
чокшне% ланга:чокшне% ланга SPAT-Prl  "illansuussa" ;
мекев:мекев Spat_  "" ;
перька:перька SPAT-Prl  "" ;
потс:потс Spat_  "" ;
потсо:потсо SPAT-Ine  "" ;
потсто:потсто SPAT-Ela  "" ;
сестэ:сестэ AdvSPAT-Ela  "" ;
сесэ:сесэ AdvSPAT-Ine  "" ;
тезэнь:тезэнь AdvSPAT-Ill  "" ;
тей:тей AdvSPAT-Lat  "" ;
теск:теск AdvSPAT-Ill  "" ;
тестэ:тестэ AdvSPAT-Ela  "" ;
тесэ:тесэ AdvSPAT-Ine  "" ;
тияка:тияка AdvSPAT-Prl  "" ;
тияня:тияня AdvSPAT-Prl  "" ;
тов:тов AdvSPAT-Lat  "sinne, tuonne" ;
тозонь:тозо AdvSPAT-Ill  "" ;
тосо:тосо AdvSPAT-Ine  "" ;
тосто:тосто AdvSPAT-Ela  "" ;
тува:тува AdvSPAT-Prl  "" ;
кавонькирда:кавонь#кирда ADV_КУДО  "" ;
знярсыя:знярсыя Temp-Indef  "" ;
зярдо:зярдо Temp-Interr  "" ;
зяросто:зяросто Temp-Interr  "" ;
зярсыя:зярсыя Temp-Indef  "" ;
икелепелев:икелепелев SPAT-NoArg  "" ;
исяк:исяк ADV_ЛАК-TEMP  "" ;
косто-косто:косто-косто Temp-Distr  "" ;
кувать:кувать ADV_КИТ-TEMP  "" ;
курок:курок ADV_ЛАК-TEMP  "nopeasti, pian, kohta" ;
лиясто:лиясто Temp-NoArg  "" ;
меелькспелев:меелькспелев Temp-Lat  "" ;
меля:меля ADV_КУДО-TEMP  "" ;
мелят:мелят Temp-Pl  "" ;
нацькес:нацькес Temp-Ill  "" ;
одсто:одсто Temp-Ela  "" ;
пелеветь:пелеветь Temp-Pl  "" ;
пиземе% шкасто:пиземе% шкасто Temp-Ela  "" ;
пиземене:пиземене Temp-Temp  "" ;
секе% тев:секе% тев Temp-Lat  "" ;
талайс:талайс Temp-Ill  "" ;
течимс:течимс Temp-ms  "" ;
улкоть:улкоть ADV_КИТ-TEMP  "" ;
цютькес:цютькес Temp-Ill  "" ;
чи% валдова:чи% валдова Temp-Prl  "" ;
чи% куншка:чи% куншка ADV_КУДО-TEMP  "" ;
чинек-венек:чинек-венек Temp-Coll  "" ;
чинь% чоп:чинь% чоп Temp-NoArg  "" ;
чистэ:чистэ TEMP_  "" ;
чияк:чияк TEMP_  "" ;
чоп:чоп TEMP_  "" ;
чоподава:чоподава Temp-Prl  "" ;
шкань-шкань:шкань-шкань Temp-Distr  "" ;
якшамоне:якшамоне Temp-Temp  "" ;
LEXICON Nouns
вандыде% мейле:вандыде% мейле ADV_КУДО  "" ;
LEXICON Verbs
пелекуломс:пелекуломс ADV_  "" ;
